Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 8. Pen Registers

§ 7-3-801.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Attorney for the state” means the attorney general or his designee, or district attorney;

“Court of competent jurisdiction” means a district court;

“Peace officer” means as defined in W.S.

7-3-701

;

“Pen register” means a device which identifies on hook and off hook conditions and records or decodes electronic or other impulses which identify the numbers dialed or otherwise transmitted on the telephone line to which the device is attached, but the term does not include any device used by a provider or customer of a wire or electronic communication service for billing, or recording as an incident to billing, for communications services provided by the provider or any device used by a provider or customer of a wire communication service for cost accounting or other like purposes in the ordinary course of its business;

“Trap and trace device” means a device which captures the incoming electronic or other impulses which identify the originating number of an instrument or device from which a wire or electronic communication was transmitted;

“Wire communication”, “electronic communication” and “electronic communication service” have the same meanings set forth in W.S.

7-3-701

;

“This act” means W.S.

7-3-801

through

7-3-806

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-3-802.
General prohibition on pen register and trap and trace device use; exception.

Except as provided in this section, no person may install or use a pen register or a trap and trace device without first obtaining a court order under W.S.

7-3-804

.

The prohibition of subsection (a) of this section does not apply with respect to the use of a pen register or a trap and trace device by a provider of electronic or wire communication service:

Relating to the operation, maintenance and testing of a wire or electronic communication service or to the protection of the rights or property of such provider, or to the protection of users of that service from abuse of service or unlawful use of service;

To record the fact that a wire or electronic communication was initiated or completed in order to protect such provider, another provider furnishing service toward the completion of the wire communication, or a user of that service, from fraudulent, unlawful or abusive use of service; or

Where the consent of the user of that service has been obtained.

A state or local agency authorized to install and use a pen register under this act shall use technology reasonably available to it that restricts the recording or decoding of electronic or other impulses to the dialing and signaling information utilized in call processing.

Whoever knowingly violates subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-801(a)(vii).

§ 7-3-803.
Application for an order for a pen register or a trap and trace device.

An attorney for the state may make application for an order or an extension of an order under W.S.

7-3-804

authorizing the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device under this act, in writing under oath or equivalent affirmation, to a court of competent jurisdiction only for investigations of violations of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971.

An application under subsection (a) of this section shall include:

The identity of the attorney for the state, making the application and the identity of the law enforcement agency conducting the investigation; and

A certification by the applicant that the information likely to be obtained is relevant to an ongoing investigation of a violation of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971 being conducted by that agency.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971. —

See §§

35-7-1001

, 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-801(a)(vii).

§ 7-3-804.
Issuance of an order for a pen register or a trap and trace device.

Upon an application made under W.S.

7-3-803

, the court shall enter an ex parte order authorizing the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device within the state if the court finds that the attorney for the state has certified to the court that the information likely to be obtained by such installation and use is relevant to an ongoing investigation of a violation of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971.

An order issued under this section:

Shall specify:

The identity, if known, of the person to whom is leased or in whose name is listed the telephone line to which the pen register or trap and trace device is to be attached;

The identity, if known, of the person who is the subject of the criminal investigation;

The number and, if known, physical location of the telephone line to which the pen register or trap and trace device is to be attached and, in the case of a trap and trace device, the geographic limits of the trap and trace order; and

A statement of the offense to which the information likely to be obtained by the pen register or trap and trace device relates.

Shall direct, upon the request of the applicant, the furnishing of information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen register or trap and trace device under W.S.

7-3-805

.

An order issued under this section shall authorize the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days. Extensions of the order may be granted, but only upon an application for an extension meeting the requirements of W.S.

7-3-803

and upon the judicial finding required by subsection (a) of this section. Each period of extension shall be for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days.

An order authorizing the installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device shall direct that:

The order be sealed until otherwise ordered by the court; and

The person owning or leasing the line to which the pen register or a trap and trace device is attached, or who has been ordered by the court to provide assistance to the applicant, not disclose the existence of the pen register or trap and trace device or the existence of the investigation to the listed subscriber, or to any other person, unless or until otherwise ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971. —

See §§

35-7-1001

, 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 7-3-805.
Assistance in installation and use of a pen register or a trap and trace device.

Upon the request of an attorney for the state or an officer of a law enforcement agency authorized to install and use a pen register under this act, a provider of wire or electronic communication service, landlord, custodian or other person shall furnish such investigative or peace officer forthwith all information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the installation of the pen register unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom the installation and use is to take place, if such assistance is directed by a court order as provided in W.S. 7-3-804(b)(ii).

Upon the request of an attorney for the state or an officer of a law enforcement agency authorized to receive the results of a trap and trace device under this act, a provider of a wire or electronic communication service, landlord, custodian or other person shall install such device forthwith on the appropriate line and shall furnish such investigative or peace officer all additional information, facilities and technical assistance including installation and operation of the device unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that the person so ordered by the court accords the party with respect to whom the installation and use is to take place, if such installation and assistance is directed by a court order as provided in W.S. 7-3-804(b)(ii). Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the results of the trap and trace device shall be furnished, pursuant to W.S. 7-3-804(b), to the officer of a law enforcement agency, designated in the court order, at reasonable intervals during regular business hours for the duration of the order.

A provider of a wire or electronic communication service, landlord, custodian or other person who furnishes facilities or technical assistance pursuant to this section shall be reasonably compensated for such reasonable expenses incurred in providing such facilities and assistance.

No cause of action shall lie in any court against any provider of a wire or electronic communication service, its officers, employees, agents or other specified persons for providing information, facilities or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order under this act.

A good faith reliance on a court order under this act, a legislative authorization, or a statutory authorization is a complete defense against any civil or criminal action brought under this act or any other law.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-801(a)(vii).

§ 7-3-806.
Reports concerning pen registers and trap and trace devices.

The attorney general shall annually report to the joint judiciary interim committee on the number of pen register orders and orders for trap and trace devices applied for under this act. The report shall be provided no later than July 1 of each year.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-3-801(a)(vii).